Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.241

Contents. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

(1) The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters' pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the date of the election or primary;

(b) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the pamphlet;

(c) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain a ballot;

(d) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before inclusion in the pamphlet;

(e) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280;

(f) A list of all student engagement hubs in the county as designated under RCW 29A.40.180; and

(g) For partisan primary elections, information on how to vote the applicable ballot format and an explanation that minor political party candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the general election ballot.

(2) The county auditor's name may not appear in the local voters' pamphlet in his or her official capacity if the county auditor is a candidate for office during the same year. His or her name may only be included as part of the information normally included for candidates.

[ 2020 c 208 s 12; 2016 c 83 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 29; 2004 c 271 s 123.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

PDFRCW 29A.32.241

Contents. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

(1) The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters' pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the date of the election or primary;

(b) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the pamphlet;

(c) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain a ballot;

(d) Candidate statements and photographs;

(e) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before inclusion in the pamphlet;

(f) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280; and

(g) A list of all student engagement hubs in the county as designated under RCW 29A.40.180.

(2) The county auditor's name may not appear in the local voters' pamphlet in an official capacity if the county auditor is a candidate for office during the same year. The auditor's name may only be included as part of the information normally included for candidates.

[ 2024 c 78 s 9; 2020 c 208 s 12; 2016 c 83 s 2; 2011 c 10 s 29; 2004 c 271 s 123.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.